cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/js/vendor/speak/dictsource/it_rules
// translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// letter groups
// A  any vowel
// C  any consonant
// K  not a vowel (i.e. consonant or end-of-word)
// Y  front vowels: e i (& accents)
.L01 a à o ò ó u ù
.L02 e é è


.group a
		a	a
		ai (K   aI
                ao (_N   aU
                au	a%u

	@C)	a (_S1q  a     // lookup it_list without suffix
	@i)	a (_S1q  a     // lookup it_list without suffix

	@)	a (cA_	=a
	@)	a (che_	=a
		a (istA_  a
		a (ismo_  a
	@)	a (bile_  'a
	@)	a (ggine_ 'a

	_)	ae (r    aI
//	@)	a (no_	=a     //ByFilo, this seems to make it_listx longer
	@)	avano (_S5  'avano
		a (tterA_   'a

.group à
		à	''a
		ài (K   ''aI
                ào (_N   ''aU
                àu	''a%u

.group b
		b       b
		bb      b:

.group c
		c	k
		cc	k:
		c ('    tS
		c (Y    tS
		cc (Y   tS:
		ch	k
		cch	k:
		ci (A	tS    // or L01 ?
		cci (A  tS:   // or L01 ?
	@)	co (lA_ =ko
		
.group d
		d	d
		dd	d:
	n)	dere    =deRe

.group e
		e        e
		ei       Ej (K
	@C)	e (_S1q  e     // lookup it_list without suffix
	@Ar)	e (_     e

		e (C_    E
		e (A     E
		e (C%A_  E    // doubled consonant
		e (CiCA_ E
		e (CulA_ E
		e (llu   E
		e (st    E
		e (ttA_	 e
	c)	e (ttA_  E
		e (tti@	 E
		e (zzA_  e

		e (r     E
		e (rsi_N e
	A)	e (r_	 'E

	_r)	e	 E

//	@)	e (ce_	=e
	@)	e (ci_	=e

		e (l     E
	r)	e (m     E
		e (monA_ 'e
		e (nA_   E
	g)	e (ne    E
		e (ngA_  e
		e (nCA_  E
	@m)	e (ntA_  e
       %C)	e (rA_   =E
	C)	e (re_	 =E
	gg)	e (ro_   E
	f)	e (rm    e
	@)	e (rrimo_ 'E
	@)	e (simo_  'e
	h)	e (ss    e
	m)	e (ss    e
	_sC)	e (ss    e
		e (ssa_  e
		e (tr    E
		e (ti    E

		e (vi_   E
		e (vo_   E
	@)	e (volA_ 'e
		e (zA    E

.group f
		f	f

	@A)	f (ilo_  =f
	A)	f (ero_  =f
		
.group g
		g	g
		gg	g:
		gh	g
		g (Y	dZ
		gi (A	dZ   // any vowel, or L01 ?
		gi (a_	dZ'i#  // [i] only if stressed
		gì (a_	dZ'i#  // [i] only if stressed
	n)	gi (a_	dZ
		gg (Y	dZ:
		ggi (A  dZ:  // or L01 ?
	@)	gger (lo_ =dZ:eR
		gl (i	l^
		gl (ì	l^
		gli (A  l^
	_)	gl	gl
		gn	n^
		gu (A   gw

	
.group h
		h
	_)	ha      h'a
	_)	hà      h'a

.group i
		i	i
		i (A	j
	l)	i (A	%i
	r)	i (A	%i
       _C)	i (a    i
       _C)	i (à    i
		i (o    i
		i (ò	i
		i (ó	i
        @)      ia (_   =i%a
	@)	ià (_	i'a
	X)	ia (_	'ia
	af)	ia (_	'ia
	fon)	ia (_	'ia
	scop)	ia (_	'ia
	er)	ia (_	'ia
	gor)	ia (_   'ia
	metr)	ia (_	'ia
	t)	ia (_	'ia
        @)      io (_S1q   =i%o
	a)	i (+	j
	à)	i (+	j
	L02)	i (+	j
	o)	i (+	j

	@C)	i (_S1q  i     // lookup it_list without suffix

        @)      i (Ante_   i
		i (acA_   'i
		i (asi_   'i
	@)	i (bile_  'i
	@)	i (cA_	  =i
	tr)	i (ce_     i
	@)	i (chA_   =i
        @)      i (dA_    =i
        @)      i (dere_  'i
	@)	ie (rA_    i'E
	@)	ié (rA_    i'E
	@)	iè (rA_    i'E
	@)	i (gA_	  =i
		i (genA_  'i
	c)	i (lA_    =i
	g)	i (lA_    =i
	ss)	i (lA_    =i
	b)	i (le_    =i
	m)	i (le_    =i
		i (lA_    =i
	@)	i (ma_	  =i
	r)	i (ma_	   i
	laCr)	i (ma_	  =i
	st)	i (ma_     i
	enz)	i (ma_     i
        @)	i (mo_    =i
		inas (_   'inas
		i (ne_    =i
	@)	issima(_S6 'issima
	@)	issime(_S6 'issime
	@)	issimi(_S6 'issimi
	@)	issimo(_S6 'issimo
	@)	issero(_S6 'issero
	p)	i (te_    =i

		
.group j
		j	j

.group k
		k	k
		kk	k:
		
.group l
		l	l
               ll (C    l_
               ll (_    l
		
.group m
		m	m
	A)	mi (a_  m'i

		
.group n
		n	n
		n (g	N
		n (gY   n
		n (k	N
		
.group o
		o	o
		oi	O%I
		oi (o_  o%I
		oi (sCA_ o'i

		o (C%A_	O    // doubled consonant
		o (CACA_  O
		o (Cr     O
		o (CC_    O


	@C)	o (_S1q  o     // lookup it_list without suffix 
	@i)	o (_S1q  o     // lookup it_list without suffix 

	i)	o          O
	i)	o (ne      o
	i)	o (so_     o

	m)	o (bile    O
		o (ca_     O
		o (co_     O
	@)	o (di_     =o
	@)	o (do_     =o
	@)	o (fono_   'O
		o (genA_   'O
	l)	o (gico_   'O
	@)	o (gnolo_  'o
	@)	o (grafo_  'O
		o (lX       O
	nd)	o (lA_     =O
	ns)	o (lA_     =O
	CC)	o (lA_     =O
	u)	o (lA_      O
	v)	o (lA_     =o
	@)	o (la_      O
	gn)	o (la_      O
		o (li       O
	@)	o (liA_     O
	@)	o (lo_     =O
	i)	o (lA_      O
       ci)	o (lA_     =O
	@)	o (logo_   'O
	c)	o (ltA_     O
	sc)	o (ltA_     o
	v)	o (lt       O
	@)	o (metro_  'O
	@)	o (ma_      O
	@)	o (mo_      O
	dr)	o (mo_     =o
		o (ni       O
		o (ni_      o
                o (no_      O
	@)	o (nomo_   'O
	@)	o (nzolo_  'o
		o (o        O
		o (polA_   'O
	sc)	o (p        O
		o (r	    O
		o (re_      o
	f)	o (rmA_     o
		o (si_      O
		o (ss       O
	Ar)	o (ssA_     o
		o (st       O
		o (stracA_  'O
		o (ttol     O
		o (zA       O

	
.group p
		p	p
		pp	p:
        _)      pn (@@   n
	_)	ps (A@	s
	@m)	p (ere_ =p

.group q
		q	kw2
		qu	kw2

.group r
	C)	r	@-*
		r	@-*
	_)	r	@-*
		rr	R*
	A)	r (A	R
		
.group s
		s	s
	_)	s	s
	A)	s (A	z

	l)      s       s
	p)      s       s
	k)	s	s
		s (c	s
		s (f	s
		s (k	s
		s (p	s
		s (q	s
		ss	ss
		s (t	s
		s (x	s
		sc (Y	S
		sci (A  S
		sci (i	S%i
		sci (ì	S%i
		sch (Y	sk
		sh (K	S    // foreign words
	K)	sh	S    // foreign words
	@)	sia	z'ia
	@C)	sia	s'ia
	@)	sià	zi'a
	@)	s (_S1	s	
		
.group t
		t	t
		tt	t:
		
.group u
		u	u
		u (A	w2
	Kr)	u (A	u
	Kl)	u (A	u

	@)	u (dine_  'u
	@)	u (colo_  'u
		u (ito_ 'u
	@)	u (lA_	=u

.group v
		v	v
	
.group w
		w	w2

.group x
		x	ks
		
.group y
		y	j
		y (K	i        // foreign words
	
		
.group z
		z	ts
	A)	zz	ts:

        _)	z (i	dz
        _)	z (ì	dz
		z (L01A	dz

.group
		è	''E
		èi (K	''Ej

		é	''e
		éi (K	''eI

		ì	''i
		ó	''o
		ói	''o|I

		ò	''O
		òi	''OI

		ù	''u

		$	dollaro
		, (D    v'irgola
		!       _p'untoesklamat'ivo_
	!)	!
		?	_p'untointeRogat'ivo_
	?)	?

        __)  - (_D         meno
        A_)  - (_D        _
        C_)  - (_D        _

		§	setsi'one
